Alaska statutes. Title 30. Navigation, Harbors, Shipping, and Transportation Facilities.
Article 1. Establishment.

Sec. 30.17.010.
Creation of authority.

There is created the Adak Reuse Authority. The authority is a public corporation of the state and a body corporate and is an instrumentality of the Department of Commerce, Community, and Economic Development, but with separate and independent legal existence.

History.

(§ 1 ch 32 SLA 1996)

Revisor’s notes. —

In 1999, in this section, “Department of Commerce and Economic Development” was changed to “Department of Community and Economic Development” in accordance with § 88, ch. 58, SLA 1999. In 2004, in this section, “Department of Community and Economic Development” was changed to “Department of Commerce, Community, and Economic Development”, in accordance with § 3, ch. 47, SLA 2004.

Sec. 30.17.020.
Membership of authority.

The membership of the authority consists of

the commissioner of commerce, community, and economic development;

two other persons selected by the governor who serve as the heads of principal departments of the executive branch of state government; and

four public members appointed by the governor, two of whom must be residents of the area that is within the boundaries of the Aleut Corporation, a Native regional corporation established under 43 U.S.C. 1606 (Alaska Native Claims Settlement Act).

If a member described in (a)(1) or (2) of this section is unable to attend a meeting of the authority, the member may, by an instrument in writing filed with the authority, designate a deputy or assistant to act in the member’s place as a member at the meeting. For purposes of this chapter, the designee is a member of the authority at the meeting.

Members of the authority described in (a)(2) and (3) of this section serve two-year terms but serve at the pleasure of the governor.

If a vacancy occurs in the membership of the authority, the governor shall immediately appoint a member for the unexpired portion of the term.

History.

(§ 1 ch 32 SLA 1996)

Revisor’s notes. —

In 1999, in this section, “commissioner of commerce and economic development” was changed to “commissioner of community and economic development” in accordance with § 88, ch. 58, SLA 1999. In 2004, in this section, “commissioner of community and economic development” was changed to “commissioner of commerce, community, and economic development”, in accordance with § 3, ch. 47, SLA 2004.

Sec. 30.17.030.
Chair and vice-chair.

The members of the authority shall elect a chair from among themselves. A vice-chair may be elected by the authority from among its other members. The vice-chair presides over all meetings in the absence of the chair and has other duties that the authority may prescribe.

History.

(§ 1 ch 32 SLA 1996)

Sec. 30.17.040.
Meetings, compensation, and employees.

A majority of the members of the authority constitutes a quorum for the transaction of business or the exercise of a power or function at a meeting of the authority. Action may be taken and motions and resolutions may be adopted by the authority only upon an affirmative vote of a majority of the full membership of the authority. The authority may meet and transact business by electronic media if (1) public notice of the time and locations where the meeting will be held by electronic media has been given in the same manner as if the meeting were held in a single location; (2) participants and members of the public in attendance can hear and have the same right to participate in the meeting as if the meeting were conducted in person; and (3) copies of pertinent reference materials, statutes, regulations, and audio-visual materials are reasonably available to participants and to the public. A meeting by electronic media as provided in this subsection has the same legal effect as a meeting in person.

The public members of the authority are entitled to $100 compensation for each day spent on official business of the authority and may be reimbursed by the authority for actual and necessary expenses at the same rate paid to members of state boards under AS

39.20.180

.

The authority may not hire employees but may contract with individuals or entities to serve in capacities it considers advisable, including service as an executive director, executive secretary, professional advisor, legal counsel, technical expert, agent, and in other positions. A contractor hired under this subsection is not a state employee for any purpose. A contract under this subsection may not exceed two years’ duration.

The authority shall keep minutes of each meeting and send a certified copy to the governor and to the Legislative Budget and Audit Committee.

History.

(§ 1 ch 32 SLA 1996)